Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 23 Risk Management; Own Risk and Solvency Assessment

Effective dates. —

Section 54, ch. 34, SLA 2015 makes this chapter effective July 1, 2015.

Sec. 21.23.010.
Risk management framework.

An insurer shall maintain a risk management framework to assist the insurer with identifying, assessing, monitoring, managing, and reporting on its material and relevant risks. This requirement may be satisfied if the insurance group of which the insurer is a member maintains a risk management framework applicable to the operations of the insurer.

History.

(§ 46 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Sec. 21.23.020.
Own risk and solvency assessment requirement.

Unless exempted under AS

21.23.040

, an insurer or the insurance group of which the insurer is a member shall conduct an own risk and solvency assessment consistent with the own risk and solvency assessment guidance manual

annually; and

when significant changes to the risk profile of the insurer or the insurance group of which the insurer is a member occur.

History.

(§ 46 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Sec. 21.23.030.
Own risk and solvency assessment summary report.

If requested by the director, an insurer shall submit an own risk and solvency assessment summary report or any combination of reports that together contain the information described in the own risk and solvency assessment guidance manual that is applicable to the insurer or the insurance group of which the insurer is a member. The director may not request more than one report a year. The insurer shall submit the report to the director within 30 days after the request, unless the insurer requests an extension in writing and the director grants the request. If an insurer is a member of an insurance group, the insurer shall submit the report required by this subsection at least annually if the director is the lead state regulator of the insurance group as determined by the procedures in the Financial Analysis Handbook adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

For a report submitted under this section, an insurer’s or insurance group’s chief risk officer or other executive having responsibility for the oversight of the insurer’s enterprise risk management process shall sign the report and attest, to the best of the officer’s or executive’s belief and knowledge, that the insurer applies the enterprise risk management process described in the report and that a copy of the report has been provided to the insurer’s board of directors or the appropriate committee of the board.

An insurer may comply with (a) of this section by providing the most recent and substantially similar report or reports provided by the insurer or another member of the insurance group of which the insurer is a member to the insurance regulator of another state or a foreign jurisdiction, if that report provides information that is comparable to the information described in the own risk and solvency assessment guidance manual. A report in a language other than English must be accompanied by a translation of that report into the English language.

History.

(§ 46 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Sec. 21.23.040.
Exemptions.

An insurer is exempt from the requirements of this chapter if

the insurer has annual direct written and unaffiliated assumed premium, including international direct and assumed premium but excluding premiums reinsured with the Federal Crop Insurance Corporation and the National Flood Insurance Program, of less than $500,000,000; and

the insurance group of which the insurer is a member has annual direct written and unaffiliated assumed premium, including international direct and assumed premium, but excluding premiums reinsured with the Federal Crop Insurance Corporation and the National Flood Insurance Program, of less than $1,000,000,000.

If an insurer qualifies for an exemption under (a)(1) of this section, but the insurance group of which the insurer is a member does not qualify for an exemption under (a)(2) of this section, then the own risk and solvency assessment summary report required under AS

21.23.030

must include every insurer in the insurance group. This requirement may be satisfied by the submission of more than one own risk and solvency assessment summary report for a combination of insurers provided the combination of reports includes every insurer within the insurance group.

If an insurer does not qualify for exemption under (a)(1) of this section, but the insurance group of which the insurer is a member qualifies for exemption under (a)(2) of this section, then the only own risk and solvency assessment summary report that may be required under AS

21.23.030

is the report applicable to that insurer.

An insurer that does not qualify for exemption under (a) of this section may apply to the director for a waiver from the requirements of this chapter based on unique circumstances. In deciding whether to grant a request for a waiver, the director may consider the type and volume of business written, ownership and organizational structure, and any other factor that the director considers relevant to the insurer or insurance group of which the insurer is a member. If the insurer is part of an insurance group with insurers domiciled in more than one state, the director shall coordinate with the lead state regulator and with the other domiciliary regulators in considering whether to grant the insurer’s request for a waiver.

Notwithstanding the exemptions stated in this section, the director may require that an insurer maintain a risk management framework, conduct an own risk and solvency assessment, and file an own risk and solvency assessment summary report

based on unique circumstances, including the type and volume of business written, ownership and organizational structure, federal agency requests, and international supervisor requests;

if the insurer has risk based capital for company action level event as set out in AS 21.14, meets one or more of the standards of an insurer considered to be impaired or in imminent danger of becoming impaired as defined in AS

21.97.900

and in regulations adopted by the director, or otherwise exhibits qualities of a troubled insurer as determined by the director.

If an insurer that qualified for an exemption under (a) of this section no longer qualifies for that exemption because of changes in premium as reflected in the insurer’s most recent annual statement or in the most recent annual statements of the insurers within the insurance group of which the insurer is a member, the insurer shall comply with the requirements of this chapter within one year after the year the threshold in (a) of this section is exceeded.

History.

(§ 46 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Sec. 21.23.050.
Contents of own risk and solvency assessment summary report.

The own risk and solvency assessment summary report under AS

21.23.030

must be prepared in compliance with the own risk and solvency assessment guidance manual, subject to the requirements of (b) of this section. The insurer shall maintain documentation and supporting information relating to the assessment and make the documentation and information available on examination or on request of the director.

The director shall use the procedures currently used in the analysis and examination of multistate or global insurers and insurance groups when reviewing the report and additional requests for information.

History.

(§ 46 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Sec. 21.23.060.
Confidentiality.

Documents, materials, or other information, including the own risk and solvency assessment summary report, that are obtained by, created by, or disclosed to the director or another person under this chapter are confidential and are considered trade secrets and proprietary business information subject to AS

21.06.060

and AS

21.22.120

. A third-party consultant is subject to the information sharing requirements of AS

21.22.120(b)

.

History.

(§ 46 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Sec. 21.23.070.
Penalties.

An insurer shall pay $1,000 for each day the insurer fails to file the report within the time required in AS

21.23.030(a)

, not to exceed $365,000. The director may reduce the penalty under this section if the insurer demonstrates to the director that the imposition of the penalty is a financial hardship to the insurer.

History.

(§ 46 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Sec. 21.23.080.
Regulations.

The director may adopt regulations to implement, define, and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 46 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Sec. 21.23.090.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“insurance group” means those insurers and affiliates included in an insurance holding company system as defined in AS

21.22.200

;

“insurer” has the meaning given in AS

21.97.900

, except that it does not include agencies, authorities, or instrumentalities of the United States or a possession or territory of the United States, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia, or a state or political subdivision of a state;

“own risk and solvency assessment” means a confidential internal assessment, appropriate to the nature, scale, and complexity of an insurer or insurance group, conducted by that insurer or insurance group of the material and relevant risks associated with the insurer’s or insurance group’s current business plan and the sufficiency of capital resources to support those risks;

“own risk and solvency assessment guidance manual” means the Own Risk and Solvency Assessment Guidance Manual developed and most recently adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners;

“own risk and solvency assessment summary report” means a confidential, high-level summary of an insurer’s or insurance group’s own risk and solvency assessment;

“risk management framework” means a set of internal policies or procedures that address an insurer’s or insurance group’s risk culture and governance, risk identification and prioritization, risk appetite, tolerance and limits, risk management controls, and risk reporting and communication as described in and most recently adopted by the own risk and solvency assessment guidance manual.

History.

(§ 46 ch 34 SLA 2015)